District of Columbia statutes.
31-3507

Filing of provider contracts.

(a)

A corporation holding a certificate of authority under this chapter may enter into contracts with licensed hospitals, licensed physicians, and other duly licensed medical services providers.

(b)

A copy of each contract form that a corporation, referred to in subsection (a) of this section, has with licensed hospitals, licensed physicians, and other duly licensed medical services providers shall be filed with the Mayor.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-245, § 8, 44 DCR 1158
1981 Ed., § 35-4707.